Utah statutes.
53A-1-1111.   Students with disabilities.

(1)  In implementing the school grading system, the State Board of Education shall provide for the inclusion of the test scores of a student with a disability.

(2)  Test scores on an alternative assessment administered to a student with a disability may substitute for a statewide assessment as defined in Section 53A-1-1102.

